Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3205
County assessor; oath; bond.

The county assessor, before entering upon the duties of the office, shall take and subscribe an oath to perform well, faithfully, and impartially such duties and shall execute a bond as required by Chapter 11, article 1.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 21, p. 393;

R.S.1913, § 6307;

Laws 1921, c. 133, art. IV, § 1, p. 551;

C.S.1929, § 77-401;

R.S.1943, § 77-401;

Laws 1969, c. 52, § 2, p. 352;

Laws 1987, LB 508, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,1988, § 77-401;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 20.

For form of oath, see section 11-101.

For other provisions relating to bond, see Chapter 11, article 1.

Elected county officials are required to give individual official bonds. Blanket bond is not sufficient. Foote v. County of Adams, 163 Neb. 406, 80 N.W.2d 179 (1956).